California statutes. Penal Code
Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by a person when that person is summoned by a peace officer to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace, while the person is actually engaged in assisting that officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26379.

Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun incident to any of the following:

(a) Complying with Section 27560 or 27565, as it pertains to that handgun.

(b) Section 28000, as it pertains to that handgun.

(c) Section 27850 or 31725, as it pertains to that handgun.

(d) Complying with Section 27875, as it pertains to that handgun.

(e) Complying with or utilizing Section 26556, 26892, 27920, 27925, 29810, or 29830, as it pertains to that
 handgun.

(f) Complying with paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 32000, as it pertains to that handgun.

(g) Complying with Section 6389 of the Family Code, as it pertains to that handgun.

(h) Complying with Section 527.9 of the Code of Civil Procedure, as it pertains to that handgun.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 19) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 544, Sec. 20.   (SB 899)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26380.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun incident to, and in the course and scope of, training of or by an individual to become a sworn peace officer as part of a course of study approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26381.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun incident to, and in the course and scope of, training of or by an individual to become licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26150) as part of a course of study necessary or authorized by the person authorized to issue the license pursuant to that chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26382.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun incident to and at the request of a sheriff or chief or other head of a municipal police department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26383.

Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun by a person when done within a place of business, a place of residence, or on private property, if done with the permission of a person who, by virtue of subdivision (a) of Section 25605, may carry openly an unloaded handgun within that place of business, place of residence, or on that private property owned or lawfully possessed by that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26384.

Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The open carrying occurs at an auction, raffle, or similar event of a nonprofit public benefit or mutual benefit corporation, at which firearms are auctioned or otherwise sold to fund the activities of that corporation or the local chapters of that corporation.

(b) The unloaded handgun is to be auctioned or otherwise sold for that nonprofit public benefit or mutual benefit corporation.

(c) The unloaded handgun is to be delivered by a person licensed pursuant to, and operating in
 accordance with, Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 738, Sec. 8.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

26385.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 171c.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26386.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun pursuant to Section 171d.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26387.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) subdivision (c) of Section 171.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26388.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun on publicly owned land, if the possession and use of a handgun is specifically permitted by the managing agency of the land and the person carrying that handgun is in lawful possession of that handgun.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26389.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the carrying of an unloaded handgun if the handgun is carried either in the locked trunk of a motor vehicle or in a locked container.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 14.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26390.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun in any of the following circumstances:

(a) The open carrying of an unloaded handgun that is regulated pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2 by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of that chapter, if the carrying of that handgun is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(b) The open carrying of an unloaded handgun that is regulated pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10 by a person who holds
 a permit issued pursuant to Section 31005, if the carrying of that handgun is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(c) The open carrying of an unloaded handgun that is regulated pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 32610) of Division 10 by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Section 32650, if the carrying is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(d) The open carrying of an unloaded handgun that is regulated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 33300) of Chapter 8 of Division 10 by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Section 33300, if the carrying of that handgun is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 700, Sec. 10.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26391.

Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun when done in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 171.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 700, Sec. 11.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26392.

Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 26350 does not apply to, or affect, the open carrying of an unloaded handgun in any of the following circumstances:

(a) By a person who finds that handgun, if the person is transporting the handgun in order to comply with Article 1 (commencing with Section 2080) of Chapter 4 of Title 6 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code as it pertains to that firearm, and, if the person is transporting the firearm to a law enforcement agency, the person gives prior notice to the law enforcement agency that the person is transporting the handgun to the law enforcement agency.

(b) By a
 person who finds that handgun and is transporting it to a law enforcement agency for disposition according to law, if the person gives prior notice to the law enforcement agency that the person is transporting the firearm to the law enforcement agency for disposition according to law.

(c) By a person who took the firearm from a person who was committing a crime against the person and is transporting it to a law enforcement agency for disposition according to law, if the person gives prior notice to the law enforcement agency that the person is transporting that handgun to the law enforcement agency for disposition according to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 110, Sec. 4.   (AB 1292)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Openly Carrying an Unloaded Handgun as a Nuisance [26395. - 26395.]

26395.

(a) The unlawful carrying of any handgun in violation of Section 26350 is a nuisance and is subject to Sections 18000 and 18005.

(b) This section does not apply to either of the following:

(1) Any firearm that was used in the violation of any provision of the Fish and Game Code or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(2) Any firearm that is forfeited pursuant to Section 5008.6 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 534, Sec. 4.   (AB 2739)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Carrying an Unloaded Firearm That is not a Handgun [26400. - 26406.]



  ARTICLE 1. Crime of Carrying an Unloaded Firearm that is not a Handgun [26400. - 26400.]

26400.

(a) A person is guilty of carrying an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun when that person carries upon his or her person an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun outside a vehicle while in any of the following areas:

(1) An incorporated city or city and county.

(2) A public place or a public street in a prohibited area of an unincorporated area of a county.

(b) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), a violation of this section is a
 misdemeanor.

(2) A violation of subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, if the firearm and unexpended ammunition capable of being discharged from that firearm are in the immediate possession of the person and the person is not in lawful possession of that firearm.

(c) (1) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9, Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any other law with a penalty greater than is set forth in this section.

(2) The provisions of this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by different provisions of law shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(d) Notwithstanding the fact that the term “an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun” is used in this section, each individual firearm shall constitute a distinct and separate offense under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 734, Sec. 3.   (AB 7)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exemptions [26405. - 26406.]

26405.

Section 26400 does not apply to, or affect, the carrying of an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun in any of the following circumstances:

(a) By a person when carried within a place of business, a place of residence, or on private real property, if that person, by virtue of subdivision (a) of Section 25605, may carry a firearm within that place of business, place of residence, or on that private real property owned or lawfully occupied by that person.

(b) By a person when carried within a place of business, a place of residence, or on private real property, if done with the permission of a person who, by virtue of subdivision (a) of Section 25605, may carry a firearm within that place of business,
 place of residence, or on that private real property owned or lawfully occupied by that person.

(c) When the firearm is either in a locked container or encased and it is being transported directly between places where a person is not prohibited from possessing that firearm and the course of travel shall include only those deviations between authorized locations as are reasonably necessary under the circumstances.

(d) If the person possessing the firearm reasonably believes that they are in grave danger because of circumstances forming the basis of a current restraining order issued by a court against another person or persons who has or have been found to pose a threat to the person’s life or safety. This subdivision may not apply when the circumstances involve a mutual restraining order issued pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Family Code absent a
 factual finding of a specific threat to the person’s life or safety. Upon a trial for violating Section 26400, the trier of fact shall determine whether the defendant was acting out of a reasonable belief that they were in grave danger.

(e) By a peace officer or an honorably retired peace officer if that officer may carry a concealed firearm pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2, or a loaded firearm pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 25900) of Chapter 3.

(f) By a person to the extent that person may openly carry a loaded firearm that is not a handgun pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 26000) of Chapter 3.

(g) As merchandise by a person who is engaged in the business of manufacturing, importing, wholesaling, repairing, or dealing in firearms and who is licensed to
 engage in that business, or the authorized representative or authorized agent of that person, while engaged in the lawful course of the business.

(h) By a duly authorized military or civil organization, or the members thereof, while parading or while rehearsing or practicing parading, when at the meeting place of the organization.

(i) By a member of a club or organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting at targets upon established target ranges, whether public or private, while the members are using firearms that are not handguns upon the target ranges or incident to the use of a firearm that is not a handgun at that target range.

(j) By a licensed hunter while engaged in hunting or while transporting that firearm when going to or returning from that hunting expedition.

(k) Incident to transportation of a handgun by a person operating a licensed common carrier, or by an authorized agent or employee thereof, when transported in conformance with applicable federal law.

(l) By a member of an organization chartered by the Congress of the United States or a nonprofit mutual or public benefit corporation organized and recognized as a nonprofit tax-exempt organization by the Internal Revenue Service while on official parade duty or ceremonial occasions of that organization or while rehearsing or practicing for official parade duty or ceremonial occasions.

(m) Within a gun show conducted pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 27200) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 27300) of Chapter 3 of Division 6.

(n) Within a school zone, as defined in Section 626.9, if that carrying is not prohibited by Section 626.9.

(o) When in accordance with the provisions of Section 171b.

(p) By a person while engaged in the act of making or attempting to make a lawful arrest.

(q) By a person engaged in firearms-related activities, while on the premises of a fixed place of business that is licensed to conduct and conducts, as a regular course of its business, activities related to the sale, making, repair, transfer, pawn, or the use of firearms, or related to firearms training.

(r) By an authorized participant in, or an authorized employee or agent of a supplier of firearms for, a motion picture, television, or video production or entertainment event, when the
 participant lawfully uses that firearm as part of that production or event, as part of rehearsing or practicing for participation in that production or event, or while the participant or authorized employee or agent is at that production or event, or rehearsal or practice for that production or event.

(s) Incident to obtaining an identification number or mark assigned for that firearm from the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 23910.

(t) At an established public target range while the person is using that firearm upon that target range.

(u) By a person when that person is summoned by a peace officer to assist in making arrests or preserving the peace, while the person is actually engaged in assisting that officer.

(v) Incident to any of the
 following:

(1) Complying with Section 27560 or 27565, as it pertains to that firearm.

(2) Section 28000, as it pertains to that firearm.

(3) Section 27850 or 31725, as it pertains to that firearm.

(4) Complying with Section 27875, as it pertains to that firearm.

(5) Complying with or utilizing Section 26556, 26892, 27920, 27925, 27966, 29810, or 29830, as it pertains to that firearm.

(6) Complying with Section 6389 of the Family Code, as it pertains to that firearm.

(7) Complying with Section 527.9 of the Code of Civil Procedure, as it pertains to that
 firearm.

(8) Complying with Section 18120, as it pertains to that firearm.

(w) Incident to, and in the course and scope of, training of, or by an individual to become a sworn peace officer as part of a course of study approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(x) Incident to, and in the course and scope of, training of, or by an individual to become licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26150) as part of a course of study necessary or authorized by the person authorized to issue the license pursuant to that chapter.

(y) Incident to and at the request of a sheriff, chief, or other head of a municipal police department.

(z) If all of the following
 conditions are satisfied:

(1) The open carrying occurs at an auction, raffle, or similar event of a nonprofit public benefit or mutual benefit corporation at which firearms are auctioned, raffled, or otherwise sold to fund the activities of that corporation or the local chapters of that corporation.

(2) The unloaded firearm that is not a handgun is to be auctioned, raffled, or otherwise sold for that nonprofit public benefit or mutual benefit corporation.

(3) The unloaded firearm that is not a handgun is to be delivered by a person licensed pursuant to, and operating in accordance with, Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(aa) Pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 171c.

(ab) Pursuant to Section 171d.

(ac) Pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 171.7.

(ad) On publicly owned land, if the possession and use of an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun is specifically permitted by the managing agency of the land and the person carrying that firearm is in lawful possession of that firearm.

(ae) By any of the following:

(1) The carrying of an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun that is regulated pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2 by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of that chapter, if the carrying of that firearm is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the
 permit.

(2) The carrying of an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun that is regulated pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10 by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Section 31005, if the carrying of that firearm is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(3) The carrying of an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun that is regulated pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 32610) of Division 10 by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Section 32650, if the carrying of that firearm is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(4) The carrying of an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun that is regulated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 33300) of Chapter 8 of Division 10 by a person who holds
 a permit issued pursuant to Section 33300, if the carrying of that firearm is conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(af) By a licensed hunter while actually engaged in training a dog for the purpose of using the dog in hunting that is not prohibited by law, or while transporting the firearm while going to or returning from that training.

(ag) Pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 171.5.

(ah) By a person who is engaged in the business of manufacturing ammunition and who is licensed to engage in that business, or the authorized representative or authorized agent of that person, while the firearm is being used in the lawful course and scope of the licensee’s activities as a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United
 States Code and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(ai) On the navigable waters of this state that are held in public trust, if the possession and use of an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun is not prohibited by the managing agency thereof and the person carrying the firearm is in lawful possession of the firearm.

(aj) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 21) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 544, Sec. 22.   (SB 899)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26406.

Section 26400 does not apply to, or affect, the carrying of an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun in any of the following circumstances:

(a) By a person who finds that firearm, if the person is carrying the firearm in order to comply with Article 1 (commencing with Section 2080) of Chapter 4 of Title 6 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code as it pertains to that firearm, and, if the person is transporting the firearm to a law enforcement agency, the person gives prior notice to the law enforcement agency that the person is transporting the firearm to the law enforcement agency.

(b) By a person who finds that firearm and is transporting it to a
 law enforcement agency for disposition according to law, if the person gives prior notice to the law enforcement agency that the person is transporting the firearm to the law enforcement agency for disposition according to law.

(c) By a person who took the firearm from a person who was committing a crime against the person and is transporting it to a law enforcement agency for disposition according to law, if the person gives prior notice to the law enforcement agency that the person is transporting the firearm to the law enforcement agency for disposition according to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 6.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 6. SALE, LEASE, OR TRANSFER OF FIREARMS [26500. - 28490.]



  CHAPTER 1. License Requirement for Sale, Lease, or Transfer of Firearms [26500. - 26625.]



  ARTICLE 1. License Requirement and Miscellaneous Exceptions [26500. - 26590.]

26500.

(a) No person shall sell, lease, or transfer firearms unless the person has been issued a license pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2.

(b) Any person violating this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26505.

Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, lease, or transfer of any firearm by any of the following:

(a) A person acting pursuant to operation of law.

(b) A person acting pursuant to a court order.

(c) A person acting pursuant to the Enforcement of Judgments Law (Title 9 (commencing with Section 680.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure).

(d) A person who liquidates a personal firearm collection to satisfy a court judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26510.

Section 26500 does not apply to a person acting pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 186.22a or Section 18000 or 18005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26515.

Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, lease, or transfer of a firearm if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The sale, lease, or transfer is made by a person who obtains title to the firearm by any of the following means:

(1) Intestate succession or bequest.

(2) As the beneficiary of a trust that includes a firearm.

(3) As a surviving spouse pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 13500) of Part 2 of Division 8 of the Probate Code.

(4) As decedent’s successor pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section
 13000) of Division 8 of the Probate Code.

(b) The person disposes of the firearm within 60 days of receipt of the firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 738, Sec. 10.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

26520.

(a) Section 26500 does not apply to the infrequent sale, lease, or transfer of firearms.

(b) As used in this section, “infrequent” has the meaning provided in Section 16730.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26525.

(a) Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, lease, or transfer of used firearms, other than handguns, at gun shows or events, as specified in Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2, by a person other than a licensee or dealer, provided the person has a valid federal firearms license and a current certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of Justice, as specified in Section 26710, and provided all the sales, leases, or transfers fully comply with Section 27545. However, the person shall not engage in the sale, lease, or transfer of used firearms other than handguns at more than 12 gun shows or events in any calendar year and shall not sell, lease, or transfer more than 15 used firearms
 other than handguns at any single gun show or event. In no event shall the person sell more than 75 used firearms other than handguns in any calendar year.

(b) The Department of Justice shall adopt regulations to administer this program and shall recover the full costs of administration from fees assessed applicants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26530.

Section 26500 does not apply to sales, deliveries, or transfers of firearms between or to importers and manufacturers of firearms licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26535.

Section 26500 does not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms that satisfies both of the following conditions:

(a) It is made by an importer or manufacturer licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(b) It is made to a dealer or wholesaler.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26537.

(a) Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms that satisfies both of the following conditions:

(1) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made by a manufacturer of ammunition licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(2) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made to a dealer or wholesaler. 

(b) Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of
 firearms between or to manufacturers of ammunition licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, where those firearms are to be used in the course and scope of the licensee’s activities as a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 7.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

26540.

(a) Section 26500 does not apply to sales, deliveries, transfers, or returns of firearms made pursuant to any of the following:

(1) Sections 18000 and 18005.

(2) Division 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Title 2.

(3) Section 29810.

(4) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11.

(5) Sections 34005 and 34010.

(b) Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm to a dealer to comply
 with Section 6389 of the Family Code.

(c) Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm to a dealer to comply with Section 527.9 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm to a dealer to comply with Section 18120.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 544, Sec. 24.   (SB 899)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26545.

Section 26500 does not apply to the loan of a firearm for the purposes of shooting at targets, if the loan occurs on the premises of a target facility that holds a business or regulatory license or on the premises of any club or organization organized for the purposes of practicing shooting at targets upon established ranges, whether public or private, if the firearm is at all times kept within the premises of the target range or on the premises of the club or organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26550.

Section 26500 does not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms that satisfies all of the following requirements:

(a) It is made by a manufacturer, importer, or wholesaler licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(b) It is made to a person who resides outside this state and is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(c) It is made in accordance with Chapter 44 (commencing
 with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26555.

Section 26500 does not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms that satisfies all of the following requirements:

(a) It is made by a person who resides outside this state and is licensed outside this state pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(b) It is made to a manufacturer, importer, or wholesaler.

(c) It is made in accordance with Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant
 thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26556.

Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm that satisfies all of the following requirements:

(a) It is made by a person who has ceased operations as a dealer.

(b) It is made to a dealer, a manufacturer, importer, or wholesaler.

(c) It is made in accordance with Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(d) The transaction is reported to the Department of Justice in a manner and format prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 738, Sec. 12.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

26560.

Section 26500 does not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms by a wholesaler to a dealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26565.

Section 26500 does not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms that satisfies all of the following conditions:

(a) It is made by a person who resides outside this state.

(b) It is made to a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(c) It is made in accordance with Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26570.

Section 26500 does not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms that satisfies all of the following conditions:

(a) It is made by a person who resides outside this state and is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(b) It is made to a dealer.

(c) It is made in accordance with Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26575.

Section 26500 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of an unloaded firearm by one wholesaler to another wholesaler if that firearm is intended as merchandise in the receiving wholesaler’s business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26576.

(a) Section 26500 does not apply to a sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The sale, delivery, or transfer is to an authorized representative of a city, city and county, county, or state government, or of the federal government, and is for the governmental entity.

(2) The entity is acquiring the firearm as part of an authorized, voluntary program in which the entity is buying or receiving firearms from private individuals.

(b) Any weapons acquired pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section shall
 be disposed of pursuant to the applicable provisions of Section 34000 or Sections 18000 and 18005.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a firearm acquired pursuant to subdivision (a) may, in lieu of destruction, be donated to a public or private nonprofit historical society, museum, or institutional collection, subject to the provisions of Section 27855, including that the firearm be deactivated or rendered inoperable before delivery.

(2) For purposes of this and other sections in this title, “deactivated or rendered inoperable” means to render the firearm permanently inoperable by means including, without limitation, welding of the chamber, cutting of the barrel, chamber, or breech, plugging the barrel, or welding the bolt to the
 chamber.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 2842)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

26577.

Section 26500 does not apply to a delivery or transfer of firearms made to a dealer pursuant to Section 26892 or 29830 for storage by that dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 251, Sec. 6.   (SB 368)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26580.

Section 26500 does not apply to the loan of an unloaded firearm or the loan of a firearm loaded with blank cartridges for use solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, or video production or entertainment or theatrical event.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26581.

Section 26500 does not apply to the delivery, sale, or transfer of an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun to a dealer if the delivery, sale, or transfer satisfies both of the following conditions:

(a) The delivery, sale, or transfer is made by a nonprofit public benefit or mutual benefit corporation, including a local chapter of the same nonprofit corporation, organized pursuant to the Corporations Code.

(b) The sale or other transfer of ownership of that firearm is to occur as part of an auction, raffle, or similar event conducted by that nonprofit public benefit or mutual benefit corporation organized pursuant to the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 738, Sec. 15.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

26582.

Section 26500 does not apply to delivery or transfer of a firearm to a law enforcement agency made in accordance with Section 27922.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 110, Sec. 6.   (AB 1292)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

26585.

Section 26500 does not apply to the delivery of an unloaded firearm that is a curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if the delivery satisfies all of the following conditions:

(a) It is made by a person licensed as a collector pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(b) It is made by a person with a current certificate of eligibility issued pursuant to Section 26710.

(c) It is made to a dealer.
